sk-SK: Kompatibilný typ rezu plátku: Filed (s orezom); Unfiled (bez orezu); Univerzálne (s orezom aj bez orezu); Iné
da: Kompatibel bladskæring: Slebet; Uslebet; Universel (slebet og uslebet); Andet
nl: Compatibele rietsnijstijl: Filed; Unfiled; Universeel (filed en unfiled); Overig
ko: 호환 리드 컷: 파일드; 언파일드; 범용(파일드 및 언파일드); 기타
th: รูปแบบการตัดลิ้นที่เข้ากันได้: ลบมุม (Filed); ไม่ลบมุม (Unfiled); อเนกประสงค์ (แบบลบมุมและไม่ลบมุม); อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Kompatibilan rez jezička: Turpijano (filed); Neturpijano (unfiled); Univerzalno (turpijano i neturpijano); Ostalo
lt-LT: Suderinamas liežuvėlio pjūvis: Su įpjova; Be įpjovos; Universalus (su įpjova ir be jos); Kita
vi: Kiểu vát dăm kèn tương thích: Cắt phẳng (Filed); Không cắt phẳng (Unfiled); Phổ thông (có và không có cắt phẳng); Khác
fi: Yhteensopiva ruokolehden leikkaus: Filed (viilattu); Viilaamaton; Yleinen (viilattu ja viilaamaton); Muu
de: Kompatibler Rohrblattschnitt: Gefeilt; Ungefeilt; Universal (gefeilt und ungefeilt); Sonstige
it: Taglio dell'ancia compatibile: Limata; Non limata; Universale (limata e non limata); Altro
pl: Zgodny krój stroika: Z profilem francuskim (Filed); Z profilem amerykańskim (Unfiled); Uniwersalne (cięcie francuskie i amerykańskie); Inne
ja: 対応リードカット: ファイルド; アンファイルド; ユニバーサル (ファイルドおよびアンファイルド); その他
ru: Совместимый срез трости: С французским срезом (filed); С американским срезом (unfiled); Универсальный (с опилом и без опила); Другое
hu: Kompatibilis nádvágás: Reszelt (filed); Nem reszelt (unfiled); Univerzális (reszelt és nem reszelt); Egyéb
fr: Coupe de lamelles compatible: Limée; Non limée; Universelle (limée et non limée); Autre
zh-TW: 相容簧片切割方式: 有銼削 (Filed); 未銼削 (Unfiled); 通用 (有銼削和未銼削); 其他
cs: Kompatibilní řez plátků: S francouzským řezem (filed); S americkým řezem (unfiled); Univerzální (francouzský a americký řez); Jiné
es: Corte de caña compatible: Limada; Sin limar; Universal (limada y sin limar); Otro
sv: Kompatibel tungklippning: Filat; Ofilat; Universell (filat och ofilat); Övrigt
el: Συμβατή κοπή γλωττίδας: Filed; Unfiled; Γενικής χρήσης (filed και unfiled); Άλλο
bg-BG: Съвместим тип изрязване на тръстика: С френски срез (Filed); С американски срез (Unfiled); Универсален (с и без срез); Друго
nb: Kompatibelt rørblad-format: Slipt (filed); Unfiled; Universell (filed og unfiled); Annet
ro-RO: Tip de tăietură compatibil al anciei: Șlefuit; Neșlefuit; Universal (șlefuit și neșlefuit); Altele
tr: Uyumlu kamış kesimi: Törpülü; Törpüsüz; Evrensel (törpülü ve törpüsüz); Diğer
zh-CN: 适用簧片切口: 法式切角 (Filed); 美式切角 (Unfiled); 通用（法式切角和美式切角）; 其他
pt-BR: Corte de palheta compatível: Lixada (filed); Sem lixar (unfiled); Universal (filed e unfiled); Outro
sl-SI: Združljiv rez piska: Piljen; Nepiljen; Univerzalno (piljeno in nepiljeno); Drugo
en: Compatible reed cut: Filed; Unfiled; Universal (filed and unfiled); Other
pt-PT: Corte de palheta compatível: Limada; Não limada; Universal (limada e não limada); Outro